Illinois, session 104th, SB4014.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 52-3.33, 2-3.84, 14-7.03, and 21B-70 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.33)  (from Ch. 122, par. 2-3.33)7    Sec. 2-3.33. Recomputation of claims. To recompute within 83 years from the final date for filing of a claim any claim for 9general State aid reimbursement to any school district and to 10recompute and adjust any such claims within 6 years from the 11final date for filing, through and ending with Fiscal Year 122026, when there has been an adverse court or administrative 13agency decision on the merits affecting the tax revenues of 14the school district. However, no such adjustment shall be made 15regarding equalized assessed valuation unless the district's 16equalized assessed valuation is changed by greater than 17$250,000 or 2%. Any adjustments for claims recomputed for the 182016-2017 school year and prior school years shall be applied 19to the apportionment of evidence-based funding in Section 2018-8.15 of this Code beginning in the 2017-2018 school year 21and thereafter. However, the recomputation of a claim for 22evidence-based funding for a school district shall not require 23the recomputation of claims for all districts, and the State   SB4014- 2 -LRB104 20610 LNS 34102 b1Board of Education shall only make recomputations of 2evidence-based funding for those districts where an adjustment 3is required, through and ending with Fiscal Year 2026. The 4State Board is authorized to and shall apply corrections to 5data used in evidence-based funding calculations that may 6result in current year adjustments and shall recover funds 7previously scheduled to be distributed or previously 8distributed to an Organizational Unit or specially funded unit 9during a fiscal year in accordance with Section 18-8.15 of 10this Code. 11    Except in the case of an adverse court or administrative 12agency decision, no recomputation of a State aid claim shall 13be made pursuant to this Section as a result of a reduction in 14the assessed valuation of a school district from the assessed 15valuation of the district reported to the State Board of 16Education by the Department of Revenue under Section 18-8.05 17or 18-8.15 of this Code unless the requirements of Section 1816-15 of the Property Tax Code and Section 2-3.84 of this Code 19are complied with in all respects. 20    This paragraph applies to all requests for recomputation 21of a general State aid or evidence-based funding claim 22received after June 30, 2003 and before July 1, 2026. In 23recomputing a general State aid or evidence-based funding 24claim that was originally calculated using an extension 25limitation equalized assessed valuation under paragraph (3) of 26subsection (G) of Section 18-8.05 of this Code or Section   SB4014- 3 -LRB104 20610 LNS 34102 b118-8.15 of this Code, a qualifying reduction in equalized 2assessed valuation shall be deducted from the extension 3limitation equalized assessed valuation that was used in 4calculating the original claim.5    From the total amount of general State aid or 6evidence-based funding to be provided to districts, 7adjustments as a result of recomputation under this Section 8together with adjustments under Section 2-3.84 must not exceed 9$25 million, in the aggregate for all districts under both 10Sections combined, of the general State aid or evidence-based 11funding appropriation in any fiscal year; if necessary, 12amounts shall be prorated among districts. If it is necessary 13to prorate claims under this paragraph, then that portion of 14each prorated claim that is approved but not paid in the 15current fiscal year may be resubmitted as a valid claim in the 16following fiscal year. 17(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22.) 18    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.84)  (from Ch. 122, par. 2-3.84)19    Sec. 2-3.84. In calculating the amount of State aid to be 20apportioned to the various school districts in this State, the 21State Board of Education shall incorporate and deduct the 22total aggregate adjustments to assessments made by the State 23Property Tax Appeal Board or Cook County Board of Appeals, as 24reported pursuant to Section 16-15 of the Property Tax Code or 25Section 129.1 of the Revenue Act of 1939 by the Department of   SB4014- 4 -LRB104 20610 LNS 34102 b1Revenue, from the equalized assessed valuation that is 2otherwise to be utilized in the initial calculation for 3adjustments reported through Fiscal Year 2026.4    From the total amount of general State aid or 5evidence-based funding to be provided to districts for 6adjustments reported through Fiscal Year 2026, adjustments 7under this Section together with adjustments as a result of 8recomputation under Section 2-3.33 must not exceed $25 9million, in the aggregate for all districts under both 10Sections combined, of the general State aid or evidence-based 11funding appropriation in any fiscal year; if necessary, 12amounts shall be prorated among districts. If it is necessary 13to prorate claims under this paragraph, then that portion of 14each prorated claim that is approved but not paid in the 15current fiscal year may be resubmitted as a valid claim in the 16following fiscal year. 17(Source: P.A. 100-465, eff. 8-31-17.) 18    (105 ILCS 5/14-7.03)  (from Ch. 122, par. 14-7.03)19    Sec. 14-7.03. Special education classes for children from 20orphanages, foster family homes, children's homes, or State 21residential units. If a school district maintains special 22education classes on the site of orphanages and children's 23homes, or if children from the orphanages, children's homes, 24foster family homes, other State agencies, or State 25residential units for children attend classes for children   SB4014- 5 -LRB104 20610 LNS 34102 b1with disabilities in which the school district is a 2participating member of a joint agreement, or if the children 3from the orphanages, children's homes, foster family homes, 4other State agencies, or State residential units attend 5classes for the children with disabilities maintained by the 6school district, then reimbursement shall be paid to eligible 7districts in accordance with the provisions of this Section by 8the Comptroller as directed by the State Superintendent of 9Education. 10    The amount of tuition for such children shall be 11determined by the actual cost of maintaining such classes, 12using the per capita cost formula set forth in Section 1314-7.01, such program and cost to be pre-approved by the State 14Superintendent of Education. 15    If a school district makes a claim for reimbursement under 16Section 18-3 of this Code it shall not include in any claim 17filed under this Section a claim for such children. Payments 18authorized by law, including State or federal grants for 19education of children included in this Section, shall be 20deducted in determining the tuition amount. 21    Nothing in this Code shall be construed so as to prohibit 22reimbursement for the tuition of children placed in for profit 23facilities. Private facilities shall provide adequate space at 24the facility for special education classes provided by a 25school district or joint agreement for children with 26disabilities who are residents of the facility at no cost to   SB4014- 6 -LRB104 20610 LNS 34102 b1the school district or joint agreement upon request of the 2school district or joint agreement. If such a private facility 3provides space at no cost to the district or joint agreement 4for special education classes provided to children with 5disabilities who are residents of the facility, the district 6or joint agreement shall not include any costs for the use of 7those facilities in its claim for reimbursement. 8    Reimbursement for tuition may include the cost of 9providing summer school programs for children with severe and 10profound disabilities served under this Section. Claims for 11that reimbursement shall be filed by November 1 and shall be 12paid on or before December 15 from appropriations made for the 13purposes of this Section. 14    The State Board of Education shall establish such rules 15and regulations as may be necessary to implement the 16provisions of this Section. 17    Claims filed on behalf of programs operated under this 18Section housed in an orphanage, children's home, private 19facility, State residential unit, district or joint agreement 20site, jail, detention center, or county-owned shelter care 21facility shall be on an individual student basis only for 22eligible students with disabilities. These claims shall be in 23accordance with applicable rules. 24    Each district claiming reimbursement for individual 25students shall have the eligibility of those students verified 26by the State Board of Education. On September 30, December 31,   SB4014- 7 -LRB104 20610 LNS 34102 b1and March 31, the State Board of Education shall voucher 2payments for individual students based upon an estimated cost 3calculated from the prior year's claim. Final claims for 4individual students for the regular school term must be 5received at the State Board of Education by June 15. Claims for 6individual students received after June 15 shall not be 7honored. Claims received by June 15 may be amended until 8August 1. Final claims for individual students shall be 9vouchered by August 31. However, notwithstanding any other 10provisions of this Section or this Code, if the amount 11appropriated for any fiscal year is less than the amount 12required for purposes of this Section, the amount required to 13eliminate any insufficient reimbursement for each district 14claim under this Section shall be reimbursed on August 31 of 15the next fiscal year. Payments required to eliminate any 16insufficiency for prior fiscal year claims shall be made 17before any claims are paid for the current fiscal year. 18    Regional superintendents may operate special education 19classes for children from orphanages, foster family homes, 20children's homes, or State residential units located within 21the educational services region upon consent of the school 22board otherwise so obligated. In electing to assume the powers 23and duties of a school district in providing and maintaining 24such a special education program, the regional superintendent 25may enter into joint agreements with other districts and may 26contract with public or private schools or the orphanage,   SB4014- 8 -LRB104 20610 LNS 34102 b1foster family home, children's home, or State residential unit 2for provision of the special education program. The regional 3superintendent exercising the powers granted under this 4Section shall be reimbursed for the actual cost of providing 5such programs by the resident district as defined in Section 614-1.11a. 7    Any child who is not a resident of Illinois who is placed 8in a child welfare institution, private facility, foster 9family home, State operated program, orphanage, or children's 10home shall have the payment for his educational tuition and 11any related services assured by the placing agent. 12    For each student with a disability who is placed in a 13residential facility by an Illinois public agency or by any 14court in this State, the costs for educating the student are 15eligible for reimbursement under this Section. 16    The district of residence of the student with a disability 17as defined in Section 14-1.11a is responsible for the actual 18costs of the student's special education program and is 19eligible for reimbursement under this Section when placement 20is made by a State agency or the courts. 21    When a dispute arises over the determination of the 22district of residence under this Section, the district or 23districts may appeal the decision in writing to the State 24Superintendent of Education, who, upon review of materials 25submitted and any other items or information he or she may 26request for submission, shall issue a written decision on the   SB4014- 9 -LRB104 20610 LNS 34102 b1matter. The decision of the State Superintendent of Education 2shall be final. 3    In the event a district does not make a tuition payment to 4another district that is providing the special education 5program and services, the State Board of Education shall 6immediately withhold 125% of the then remaining annual tuition 7cost from the State aid or categorical aid payment due to the 8school district that is determined to be the resident school 9district. All funds withheld by the State Board of Education 10shall immediately be forwarded to the school district where 11the student is being served. 12    When a child eligible for services under this Section is 1314-7.03 must be placed in a nonpublic facility, that facility 14shall meet the programmatic requirements of Section 14-7.02 15and its regulations, and the educational services shall be 16funded only in accordance with this Section 14-7.03.17    Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, when a child 18eligible for services under this Section is placed in a 19separate public day school, that school shall meet the 20definition of Section 14-1.08a and the programmatic 21requirements and rules for separate public day schools, and 22the educational services shall be funded only in accordance 23with this Section. 24(Source: P.A. 101-17, eff. 6-14-19.) 25    (105 ILCS 5/21B-70)  SB4014- 10 -LRB104 20610 LNS 34102 b1    Sec. 21B-70. Illinois Teaching Excellence Program.2    (a) As used in this Section:3    "Diverse candidate" means a candidate who identifies with 4any of the ethnicities reported on the Illinois Report Card 5other than White. 6    "Hard-to-staff school" means a public school in which no 7less than 30% of the student enrollment is considered 8low-income as reported by the report card under Section 10-17a 9of this Code. 10    "National Board certified teacher candidate cohort 11facilitator" means a National Board certified teacher who 12collaborates to advance the goal of supporting all other 13candidate cohorts other than diverse candidate cohorts through 14the Illinois National Board for Professional Teaching 15Standards Comprehensive Support System. 16    "National Board certified teacher diverse candidate cohort 17facilitator" means a National Board certified teacher who 18collaborates to advance the goal of supporting racially and 19ethnically diverse candidates through the Illinois National 20Board for Professional Teaching Standards Comprehensive 21Support System.22    "National Board certified teacher diverse liaison" means 23an individual or entity that supports the National Board 24certified teacher leading a diverse candidate cohort.25    "National Board certified teacher liaison" means an 26individual or entity that supports the National Board   SB4014- 11 -LRB104 20610 LNS 34102 b1certified teacher leading candidate cohorts other than diverse 2candidate cohorts. 3    "National Board certified teacher rural or remote or 4distant candidate cohort facilitator" means a National Board 5certified teacher who collaborates to advance the goal of 6supporting rural or remote candidates through the Illinois 7National Board for Professional Teaching Standards 8Comprehensive Support System. 9    "National Board certified teacher rural or remote or 10distant liaison" means an individual or entity that supports 11the National Board certified teacher leading a rural or remote 12candidate cohort. 13    "Qualified educator" means a teacher or school counselor 14currently employed in a school district who is in the process 15of obtaining certification through the National Board for 16Professional Teaching Standards or who has completed 17certification and holds a current Professional Educator 18License with a National Board for Professional Teaching 19Standards designation or a retired teacher or school counselor 20who holds a Professional Educator License with a National 21Board for Professional Teaching Standards designation.22    "Rural or remote" or "rural or remote or distant" means 23local codes 32, 33, 41, 42, and 43 of the New Urban-Centric 24Locale Codes, as defined by the National Center for Education 25Statistics. 26    "Tier 1" has the meaning given to that term under Section   SB4014- 12 -LRB104 20610 LNS 34102 b118-8.15. 2    "Tier 2" has the meaning given to that term under Section 318-8.15. 4    (b) Any funds appropriated for the Illinois Teaching 5Excellence Program must be used to provide monetary assistance 6and incentives for qualified educators who are employed by or 7retired from school districts and who have or are in the 8process of obtaining licensure through the National Board for 9Professional Teaching Standards and for indirect costs 10necessary for program operation. The goal of the program is to 11improve instruction and student performance.12    The State Board of Education shall allocate an amount as 13annually appropriated by the General Assembly for the Illinois 14Teaching Excellence Program for (i) application or re-take 15fees for each qualified educator seeking to complete 16certification through the National Board for Professional 17Teaching Standards, to be paid directly to the National Board 18for Professional Teaching Standards, and (ii) incentives under 19paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subsection (c) for each 20qualified educator, to be distributed to the respective school 21district, and incentives under paragraph (5) of subsection 22(c), to be distributed to the respective school district or 23directly to the qualified educator. The school district shall 24distribute this payment to each eligible teacher or school 25counselor as a single payment.26    The State Board of Education's annual budget must set out   SB4014- 13 -LRB104 20610 LNS 34102 b1by separate line item the appropriation for the program. 2Unless otherwise provided by appropriation, qualified 3educators are eligible for monetary assistance and incentives 4outlined in subsections (c) and (d) of this Section.5    (c) When there are adequate funds available, monetary 6assistance and incentives shall include the following:7        (1) A maximum of $2,000 toward the application or 8    re-take fee for teachers or school counselors in a Tier 1 9    school district who apply on a first-come, first-serve 10    basis for National Board certification.11        (2) A maximum of $2,000 toward the application or 12    re-take fee for teachers or school counselors in a school 13    district other than a Tier 1 school district who apply on a 14    first-come, first-serve basis for National Board 15    certification.16        (3) A maximum of $1,000 toward the National Board for 17    Professional Teaching Standards' renewal application fee.18        (4) (Blank).19        (5) An annual incentive of no more than $2,250 20    prorated at $50 per hour, which shall be paid to each 21    qualified educator currently employed in a school district 22    who holds both a National Board for Professional Teaching 23    Standards designation and a current corresponding 24    certificate issued by the National Board for Professional 25    Teaching Standards and who agrees, in writing, to provide 26    up to 45 hours of mentoring or National Board for   SB4014- 14 -LRB104 20610 LNS 34102 b1    Professional Teaching Standards professional development 2    or both during the school year to classroom teachers or 3    school counselors, as applicable. Funds must be disbursed 4    on a first-come, first-serve basis, with priority given to 5    Tier 1 school districts. Mentoring shall include, either 6    singly or in combination, the following:7            (A) National Board for Professional Teaching 8        Standards certification candidates.9            (B) National Board for Professional Teaching 10        Standards re-take candidates.11            (C) National Board for Professional Teaching 12        Standards renewal candidates.13            (D) (Blank).14    Funds may also be used for professional development 15training provided by the National Board Resource Center. 16    Funds may also be used for instructional leadership 17training for qualified educators interested in supporting 18implementation of the Illinois Learning Standards or teaching 19and learning priorities of the State Board of Education or 20both. 21    (d) In addition to the monetary assistance and incentives 22provided under subsection (c), if adequate funds are 23available, incentives shall include the following incentives 24for the program in rural or remote schools or school districts 25or for programs working with diverse candidates or for 26retention bonuses for hard-to-staff schools, to be distributed   SB4014- 15 -LRB104 20610 LNS 34102 b1to the respective school district or directly to the qualified 2educator or entity: 3        (1) A one-time incentive of $3,000 payable to National 4    Board certified teachers teaching in Tier 1 or Tier 2 5    rural or remote school districts or rural or remote 6    schools in Tier 1 or Tier 2 school districts, with 7    priority given to teachers teaching in Tier 1 rural or 8    remote school districts or rural or remote schools in Tier 9    1 school districts. 10        (2) An annual incentive of $3,200 for National Board 11    certified teacher rural or remote or distant candidate 12    cohort facilitators, diverse candidate cohort 13    facilitators, and candidate cohort facilitators. Priority 14    shall be given to rural or remote candidate cohort 15    facilitators and diverse candidate cohort facilitators. 16        (3) An annual incentive of $2,500 for National Board 17    certified teacher rural or remote or distant liaisons, 18    diverse liaisons, and liaisons. Priority shall be given to 19    rural or remote liaisons and diverse liaisons. 20        (4) An annual retention bonus of up to $4,000 per year 21    for 2 consecutive years shall be awarded to National Board 22    certified teachers employed in hard-to-staff schools. 23    Funds must be disbursed equally on an annual basis among 24    all qualified educators on a first-come, first-served 25    basis.26(Source: P.A. 103-122, eff. 6-30-23; 103-207, eff. 1-1-24;   SB4014- 16 -LRB104 20610 LNS 34102 b1103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.